Colorado, session 2026A, HB1313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-32-104, amend (5)
as follows:
29-32-104. Permissible expenditures - affordable housing
programs - report - definitions.
(5) (a) If the Legislative Council Staff's March Economic and
Revenue Forecast in any given year projects revenue for the next state fiscal
year will fall below the revenue limit imposed under section 20 of article X
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

of the state constitution, the general assembly may reduce the funding
allocated to the office required by this section for the next state fiscal year
in order to balance the state budget for said state fiscal year.
(b) FOR ANY STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR WHICH THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
REDUCES THE FUNDING ALLOCATED TO THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (5), THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL, IN COORDINATION WITH THE
OFFICE, CONDUCT A PUBLIC STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT PROCESS TO
INFORM THE PLANNED ALLOCATIONS AND STRATEGIC PRIORITIES OF THAT
STATE FISCAL YEAR'S FUNDING ALLOCATED TO THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION. THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL PUBLISH ONLINE THE FINAL
PLANNED ALLOCATIONS AND STRATEGIC PRIORITIES OF THAT STATE FISCAL
YEAR'S FUNDING ALLOCATED TO THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-32-102, add (5) as
follows:
29-32-102. State affordable housing fund.
(5) (a) DURING THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER THE FIRST EIGHTY MILLION DOLLARS THAT THE TREASURER
DEPOSITS INTO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION
DURING THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR TO THE FINANCING FUND.
(b) DURING THE 2027-28 STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER THE FIRST FORTY MILLION DOLLARS THAT THE TREASURER
DEPOSITS INTO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION
DURING THE 2027-28 STATE FISCAL YEAR TO THE FINANCING FUND.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 29-32-103 (3):
(I) ON JULY 1, 2027, OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE THEREAFTER, THE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FORTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL OF THE
BALANCE OF THE FUND PLUS THE AMOUNT ALREADY TRANSFERRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE SUPPORT FUND
AND TRANSFER THE REMAINING BALANCE OF THE FUND TO THE FINANCING
FUND; AND
(II) ON JULY 1, 2028, OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE THEREAFTER, THE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FORTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL OF THE
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

BALANCE OF THE FUND PLUS THE AMOUNT ALREADY TRANSFERRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION TO THE SUPPORT FUND
AND TRANSFER THE REMAINING BALANCE OF THE FUND TO THE FINANCING
FUND.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-32-105, amend
(1)(a), (1)(c) introductory portion, (1)(c)(I), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (3); and add
(1)(d.5), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and (11) as follows:
29-32-105. Affordable housing commitments - local governments
- tribal governments - three-year commitment cycle - expedited
development approval process - eligibility for assistance from the fund
- waivers.
(1) (a) Not later than November 1, 2023, the governing body of each
local government, other than local housing authorities, or tribal government
desiring to receive funding under this article or desiring to make affordable
housing projects within its territorial boundaries eligible for funding under
this article shall make and file with the division a commitment specifying
how, by December 31, 2026, the combined number of newly constructed
affordable housing units and existing units converted to affordable housing,
within its territorial boundaries shall be increased by three percent each year
over the baseline number of affordable housing units within its territorial
boundaries, determined as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(c) FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024,
the baseline number of affordable housing units within the territorial
boundaries of a local government or tribal government, as referenced in this
subsection (1), shall be determined by the local government or tribal
government by reference to:
(I) The 2017-2021 American Community Survey 5-year FIVE-YEAR
estimates published by the United States census bureau; The baseline
number shall reset for 2027, based on the 2020-2024 American Community
Survey 5-year estimates, expected to be published in the spring of 2026 and
every third year thereafter with the publication of the corresponding
American Community Survey 5-year estimates; or
(d) By November 1, 2026 and by November 1st of each subsequent
year in which the baseline resets PRECEDING THE FIRST YEAR OF A
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

THREE-YEAR CYCLE, the governing body of each local government, other
than local housing authorities, or tribal government desiring to receive
funding under this article ARTICLE 32 or desiring to make affordable
housing projects within its territorial boundaries eligible for funding under
this article ARTICLE 32 shall make and file with the division a commitment
specifying how, by December 31 of the third year thereafter, the combined
number of newly constructed affordable housing units, and existing units
converted to affordable housing, AND UNITS WITH AFFORDABILITY
RESTRICTIONS THAT EXTEND BEYOND THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE AND FOR AT
LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS within its territorial boundaries shall be increased by
three percent each year over the baseline number of affordable housing
units within its territorial boundaries determined as provided in subsection
(1)(c) of this section THE TARGET INCREASE NUMBER. THE TARGET INCREASE
NUMBER EQUALS THE AVERAGE ANNUAL NUMBER OF PERMITS FOR NEW
HOUSING UNITS OR FUNCTIONAL EQUIVALENTS OF PERMITS FOR NEW
HOUSING UNITS THAT HAVE BEEN ISSUED OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS
WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, MULTIPLIED BY THE
NUMBER OF YEARS OF THE UPCOMING THREE-YEAR CYCLE TO WHICH A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT IS COMMITTING, MULTIPLIED BY:
(I) TEN ONE-HUNDREDTHS IF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL JOB GROWTH
RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS RECORDED BY THE STATE
DEMOGRAPHY OFFICE FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IS LOCATED, IS SIGNIFICANTLY LOWER THAN THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN
ANNUAL JOB GROWTH RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS DETERMINED
BY THE DIVISION;
(II) FIFTEEN ONE-HUNDREDTHS IF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL JOB
GROWTH RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS RECORDED BY THE STATE
DEMOGRAPHY OFFICE FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IS LOCATED, IS CLOSE TO THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN ANNUAL JOB GROWTH
RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS DETERMINED BY THE DIVISION; OR
(III) TWENTY ONE-HUNDREDTHS IF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL JOB
GROWTH RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS RECORDED BY THE STATE
DEMOGRAPHY OFFICE FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IS LOCATED, IS SIGNIFICANTLY HIGHER THAN THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN
ANNUAL JOB GROWTH RATE OVER THE PAST THREE YEARS, AS DETERMINED
BY THE DIVISION.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

(d.5) FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027,
AND FOR EACH THREE-YEAR CYCLE THEREAFTER, THE DIVISION SHALL
ESTABLISH THRESHOLDS FOR JOB GROWTH RATES THAT THE DIVISION
CONSIDERS TO BE SIGNIFICANTLY LOWER THAN, CLOSE TO, OR SIGNIFICANTLY
HIGHER THAN THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN ANNUAL JOB GROWTH RATE OVER THE
PAST THREE YEARS, TO BE USED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS
SECTION TO DETERMINE THE TARGET INCREASE NUMBER. IN ESTABLISHING
THE THRESHOLDS FOR JOB GROWTH RATES, THE DIVISION SHALL DEFINE EACH
THRESHOLD AS A SPECIFIC NUMERICAL RANGE BASED ON THE STATEWIDE
MEDIAN ANNUAL JOB GROWTH RATE FOR THE PAST THREE YEARS.
(e) In drafting and enacting commitments under this subsection (1)
local governments and tribal governments should prioritize high-density
housing, mixed-income housing, and projects consistent with the goal of
environmental sustainability, when appropriate, and should prioritize
affordable housing in communities in which low concentrations of
affordable housing exist.
(3) (a) Beginning in 2027, to be eligible under this article ARTICLE
32 for direct funding, or for affordable housing projects within a local
government's or tribal government's territorial boundaries to be eligible for
funding, local governments, other than local housing authorities, or tribal
governments, must SHALL:
(I) Satisfy both the requirements of subsection (1) of this section to
commit to and achieve annual increases in the number of affordable housing
units within their territorial boundaries, and the requirements of subsection
(2) of this section to implement a system to expedite the development
approval process for affordable housing projects; OR
(II) SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION
TO COMMIT TO INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS
WITHIN THEIR TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES, SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION TO IMPLEMENT A SYSTEM TO EXPEDITE THE
DEVELOPMENT APPROVAL PROCESS FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS,
AND HAVE RECEIVED APPROVAL FROM THE DIVISION OF A GOOD FAITH
EFFORT WAIVER SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) (I) If a local government or tribal government makes and files
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

with the division the commitment required by subsection (1) of this section
by November 1, 2023, it shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section through December 31, 2026.
(II) If a local government or tribal government makes and files with
the division the commitment required by subsection (1) of this section by
November 1, 2026, or by November 1st of a subsequent year in which the
baseline resets, PRECEDING THE FIRST YEAR OF A THREE-YEAR CYCLE, and
it met its commitment to increase affordable housing made under subsection
(1) of this section for the previous three-year cycle OR RECEIVED A WAIVER
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, it shall be deemed to have HAS satisfied the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section through the end of the current
three-year cycle.
(III) If a local government, other than a local housing authority, or
tribal government fails to make and file with the division the commitment
required by subsection (1) of this section by November 1, 2023, or by
November 1st of a subsequent year in which the baseline resets, PRECEDING
THE FIRST YEAR OF A THREE-YEAR CYCLE, it shall be THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IS ineligible to receive financial assistance from the division
or administrator during the following calendar year.
(IV) If a local government or tribal government fails to meet its
commitment to increase affordable housing made and filed pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section for any three-year cycle AND DOES NOT
RECEIVE A WAIVER PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, it shall be IS ineligible to
receive financial assistance from the division or administrator during the
first calendar year of the next three-year cycle.
(V) An ineligible local government or tribal government may apply
for a subsequent year with a new commitment under subsection (1) of this
section for the balance of the then-current three-year cycle.
(VI) A developer, whether for-profit or nonprofit, or a local
government or tribal government developing an affordable housing project
within the territorial boundaries of a local government or tribal government
that fails to meet the requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall be AND THAT HAS NOT RECEIVED A WAIVER PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION
IS ineligible to receive financial assistance from the division or
administrator. Notwithstanding this restriction, a project within the
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

territorial boundaries of an eligible municipality shall be IS eligible for
funding even if the county in which the project is located is ineligible.
(VII) Ineligible local governments and tribal governments and
developers of projects in ineligible local government and tribal government
jurisdictions shall ARE not be required to pay back to the division or the
administrator money paid to them under this article ARTICLE 32 prior to
ineligibility.
(d) (I) The division shall be IS responsible for determining
compliance with this section. For the purpose of calculating whether a local
government or tribal government has met the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section:
(A) A new residential housing unit is to be counted at the time it is
permitted rather than the time it is constructed;
(B) An existing housing unit newly qualifying as affordable housing
is to be counted at the time it is permitted and fully funded rather than at the
time the conversion is completed; For the purpose of calculating whether
a local government or tribal government has met the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section,
(C) In addition to affordable housing growth achieved through the
programs in this article ARTICLE 32, any new deed restricted affordable
housing WITH A FORMAL AFFORDABILITY RESTRICTION THAT IS newly
constructed, or NEWLY converted to affordable HOUSING, OR THAT HAS AN
AFFORDABILITY MECHANISM THAT EXTENDS BEYOND THE THREE-YEAR
CYCLE AND FOR AT LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS within a local government's or
tribal government's territorial boundaries shall be IS counted toward the
local government's or tribal government's growth requirement; For the
purpose of calculating whether a local government or tribal government has
met the requirements of subsection (1) of this section,
(D) All units funded through the programs created in section
29-32-104 (1)(b), (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(II), and (1)(c)(III) are counted towards
TOWARD the local government's or tribal government's growth requirement;
AND
(E) EACH HOUSING UNIT THAT IS DEVELOPED AS PART OF A LARGER
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

DEVELOPMENT PROJECT THAT IS SUBJECT TO A DEED RESTRICTION OF AT
LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS AND IN WHICH THE AVERAGE RENTAL PRICE OF ALL
UNITS IN THE PROJECT IS AFFORDABLE TO A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN ANNUAL
INCOME OF AT OR BELOW SIXTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME
COUNTS AS ONE AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT.
(II) (A) Regional collaboration and partnership is encouraged.
(B) IF LOCAL GOVERNMENTS HAVE NOT ENTERED INTO A WRITTEN
AGREEMENT THAT DESCRIBES OTHERWISE, FOR THE PURPOSE OF
CALCULATING WHETHER A LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS MET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE THREE-YEAR
CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, AND FOR EACH THREE-YEAR CYCLE
THEREAFTER, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY COUNT AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING
UNIT THAT WAS NEWLY CONSTRUCTED OR NEWLY CONVERTED TO
AFFORDABLE HOUSING, WITH MONEY PROVIDED BY MULTIPLE LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS AS A PERCENTAGE OF ONE UNIT THAT IS PROPORTIONAL TO
THE PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL LOCAL GOVERNMENT FUNDING THAT THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT PROVIDED.
(C) Local governments and tribal governments may enter into
written agreements with other local governments and tribal governments
that allow each jurisdiction to receive partial credit towards TOWARD the
local government's or tribal government's growth requirement for the
purpose of calculating whether a local government or tribal government has
met the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. THESE WRITTEN
AGREEMENTS ARE NOT SUBJECT TO THE FORMULA DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(3)(d)(II)(B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) EXCEPT FOR ANY CREDITS AWARDED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(9) OR (10) OF THIS SECTION THAT ARE IN EXCESS OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
UNITS PRODUCED, the sum of the total units credited to the local
governments and tribal governments shall MUST not exceed the total number
of units produced through the collaboration.
(4) IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OTHER THAN A LOCAL HOUSING
AUTHORITY, DESIRES TO RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER THIS ARTICLE 32 OR
DESIRES TO MAKE AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL
BOUNDARIES ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING UNDER THIS ARTICLE 32, AND IS UNABLE
TO ACHIEVE, FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024,
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

THE ANNUAL INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS
WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY FILE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT WAIVER
WITH THE DIVISION. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IS ELIGIBLE TO FILE A GOOD
FAITH EFFORT WAIVER AND BE APPROVED BY THE DIVISION IF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION AND:
(a) HAS RECEIVED APPROVAL FROM THE DIVISION THAT THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT HAS COMPLIED WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION;
(b) HAS RECEIVED TECHNICAL GUIDANCE FROM THE DIVISION'S
PROPOSITION 123 COMMUNITY SUPPORT TEAM; AND
(c) (I) HAS ACHIEVED AT LEAST SIXTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE ANNUAL
INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS WITHIN ITS
TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION
FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024;
(II) IS ABLE TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT OF SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION TO ACHIEVE ANNUAL INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES FOR THE
THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024 IF THE REQUIREMENT
HAD BEEN BASED ON THE TARGET INCREASE NUMBER SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(III) HAS, WITHIN THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY
1, 2024, PROVIDED MONEY TO FUND THE DEVELOPMENT OF AFFORDABLE
HOUSING UNITS THAT COUNTED TOWARD ANOTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S
ANNUAL INCREASE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND
WOULD HAVE BEEN ABLE TO ACHIEVE AT LEAST SIXTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE
ANNUAL INCREASE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAD BEEN ABLE TO COUNT THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING
UNITS TO WHICH IT PROVIDED MONEY IN PROPORTION TO THE PERCENTAGE
OF TOTAL LOCAL GOVERNMENT FUNDING PROVIDED.
(5) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO FILE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT WAIVER AND BE
APPROVED BY THE DIVISION, IN ADDITION TO MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS
OF SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL:
(a) SUBMIT A NARRATIVE DESCRIPTION OF ITS ACHIEVEMENTS IN
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

ADVANCING AFFORDABLE HOUSING DEVELOPMENTS WITHIN THE
THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024;
(b) SUBMIT DOCUMENTATION OF ITS ADOPTION OF LOCAL LAND USE,
ZONING, OR REGULATORY REFORMS THAT INCREASE THE FEASIBILITY OF
DEVELOPING AFFORDABLE HOUSING;
(c) SUBMIT DOCUMENTATION OF ADDITIONAL LOCAL COMMITMENTS
TO FUND AFFORDABLE HOUSING OR ESTABLISHED METHODS FOR REDUCING
THE COST OF DEVELOPING AFFORDABLE HOUSING;
(d) IMPLEMENT PROCESS OR CAPACITY IMPROVEMENTS THAT REDUCE
BARRIERS TO DEVELOPING AFFORDABLE HOUSING, SUCH AS A HOUSING
ACTION PLAN; OR
(e) PARTICIPATE IN REGIONAL COLLABORATION TO DEVELOP MORE
AFFORDABLE HOUSING THROUGH A FORMAL REGIONAL AGREEMENT.
(6) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SEEKING A GOOD FAITH EFFORT WAIVER
FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024 SHALL, ON OR
AFTER JUNE 15, 2026 BUT BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2026, SUBMIT TO THE
DIVISION DOCUMENTATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (4) AND (5)
OF THIS SECTION. THE DIVISION SHALL DETERMINE, IN ITS DISCRETION,
WHETHER TO GRANT A GOOD FAITH EFFORT WAIVER TO A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(7) IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OTHER THAN A LOCAL HOUSING
AUTHORITY, DESIRES TO RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER THIS ARTICLE 32 OR
DESIRES TO MAKE AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL
BOUNDARIES ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING UNDER THIS ARTICLE 32, BUT IS UNABLE
TO ACHIEVE, FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027,
THE ANNUAL INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS
WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY FILE AN ADJUSTMENT WAIVER WITH
THE DIVISION. TO BE ELIGIBLE TO FILE AN ADJUSTMENT WAIVER FOR THE
THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, AND BE APPROVED BY
THE DIVISION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL:
(a) RECEIVE APPROVAL FROM THE DIVISION THAT THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT HAS COMPLIED WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION;
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

(b) SUBMIT TO THE DIVISION A DETAILED NARRATIVE EXPLAINING
WHY THE ANNUAL INCREASE IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING
UNITS IS UNATTAINABLE WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES FOR THE
THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027. THE DETAILED
NARRATIVE MUST BE SUPPORTED BY RELIABLE AND VERIFIABLE DATA, SUCH
AS:
(I) A LOCAL HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT COMPLETED NO EARLIER
THAN THREE YEARS BEFORE SUBMITTAL;
(II) AN INVENTORY OF DEED-RESTRICTED UNITS RECORDED WITH THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR COUNTY CLERK FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT IS LOCATED;
(III) A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN OR AREA PLAN GROWTH PROJECTIONS
DEMONSTRATING THAT THE ANNUAL INCREASE REQUIREMENT IN THE
NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS EXCEEDS THE TOTAL PROJECTED
GROWTH OF THE JURISDICTION BY A SIGNIFICANT MARGIN;
(IV) UTILITY OR SERVICE PROVIDER DOCUMENTATION;
(V) INFRASTRUCTURE CAPACITY LIMITATIONS; OR
(VI) ENVIRONMENTAL OR GEOGRAPHIC CONSTRAINT MAPS;
(c) PROPOSE A REVISED ANNUAL INCREASE IN THE NUMBER OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS BASED ON THE VERIFIABLE DATA SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS NOT LESS THAN
ONE UNIT PER YEAR; AND
(d) FILE DOCUMENTATION WITH THE DIVISION DEMONSTRATING THAT
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S COMMITMENT FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE
BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, REPRESENTED A SIGNIFICANT INCREASE
ABOVE ITS COMMITMENT FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON
JANUARY 1, 2027.
(8) IN ADDITION TO THE CRITERIA LISTED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS
SECTION, WHEN DECIDING WHETHER TO GRANT AN ADJUSTMENT WAIVER,
THE DIVISION SHALL ALSO CONSIDER WHETHER AND THE EXTENT TO WHICH
A LOCAL GOVERNMENT EXCEEDED THE ANNUAL INCREASE IN THE NUMBER
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE
BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2024.
(9) FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING WHETHER A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT, OTHER THAN A LOCAL HOUSING AUTHORITY, HAS ACHIEVED
THE ANNUAL INCREASES IN THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS
WITHIN ITS TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION FOR THE THREE-YEAR CYCLE BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, AND
FOR EACH THREE-YEAR CYCLE THEREAFTER, AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT
THAT SATISFIES THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA COUNTS FOR ONE AFFORDABLE
HOUSING UNIT PLUS THE FOLLOWING CORRESPONDING ADDITIONAL UNIT
AMOUNT:
(a) AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT THAT IS DEVELOPED ON LAND
DONATED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT QUALIFIES FOR AN ADDITIONAL
ONE-TENTH OF A UNIT. THE ONE-TENTH OF A UNIT QUALIFIES FOR THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT THAT DONATED THE LAND.
(b) AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT THAT IS DEVELOPED WITH MONEY
PROVIDED BY MULTIPLE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS QUALIFIES FOR AN
ADDITIONAL ONE-TENTH OF A UNIT FOR EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT
PROVIDED MONEY;
(c) AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT THAT IS DEVELOPED TO BE
FOR-SALE HOUSING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 29-32-101 (2) OR THAT
IS DEVELOPED AND SOLD IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a) QUALIFIES FOR AN ADDITIONAL TWO-TENTHS OF
A UNIT; AND
(d) AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT THAT IS RESTRICTED TO BE
RENTED OR SOLD TO A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN ANNUAL INCOME OF AT OR
BELOW FORTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME, INCLUDING A
SUPPORTIVE HOUSING UNIT AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-32-3701 (17),
QUALIFIES FOR AN ADDITIONAL TWO-TENTHS OF A UNIT.
(10) IF AFFORDABLE HOUSING THAT COUNTS TOWARD A
COMMITMENT MADE BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION IS DEVELOPED AND QUALIFIES FOR A PROPERTY TAX
EXEMPTION, THEREBY REDUCING PROPERTY TAX REVENUE TO THE COUNTY
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

IN WHICH THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING IS LOCATED, AND THE COUNTY DID NOT
PROVIDE ANY MONEY TO DEVELOP THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING, THE DIVISION
MAY, IN ITS DISCRETION, ALLOW EACH SUCH AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT TO
COUNT AS UP TO ONE AND FIFTEEN-HUNDREDTHS AFFORDABLE HOUSING
UNITS FOR THE COUNTY AT THE TIME OF VERTICAL CONSTRUCTION.
(11) BEGINNING IN 2027, TO BE ELIGIBLE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 32
FOR DIRECT FUNDING, OR FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS WITHIN A
TRIBAL GOVERNMENT'S TERRITORIAL BOUNDARIES TO BE ELIGIBLE UNDER
THIS ARTICLE 32 FOR FUNDING, TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS SHALL SATISFY THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION TO IMPLEMENT A
SYSTEM TO EXPEDITE THE DEVELOPMENT APPROVAL PROCESS FOR
AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS AND SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE OF SUCH
SATISFACTION TO THE DIVISION.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1313

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1313